Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB938.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 338.991 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any employer who willfully or repeatedly violates the requirement of any section
of this chapter, including any standard, regulation, or order promulgated pursuant to
this chapter, may be assessed a civil penalty of up to one hundred forty thousand
dollars ($140,000), as shall be adjusted as provided in subsection (13) of this
section,[seventy thousand dollars ($70,000)] for each violation, but not less than
five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each willful violation.
(2) Any employer who has received a citation for a serious violation of the
requirements of any section of this chapter, including any standard, regulation, or
order promulgated pursuant to this chapter, shall be assessed a civil penalty of up to
fourteen thousand dollars ($14,000), as shall be adjusted as provided in
subsection (13) of this section,[seven thousand dollars ($7,000)] for each violation.
(3) Any employer who has received a citation for a violation of the requirements of any
section of this chapter, including any standard, regulation, or order promulgated
pursuant to this chapter, and such violation is specifically determined not to be of a
serious nature, may be assessed a civil penalty of up to fourteen thousand dollars
($14,000), as shall be adjusted as provided in subsection (13) of this
section,[seven thousand dollars ($7,000)] for each violation.
(4) Any employer who receives a notice of a de minimis violation of any section of this
chapter, including any standard, administrative regulation, or order promulgated
pursuant to this chapter, shall not be assessed a civil penalty. As used in this
subsection, a de minimis violation is a violation that has no direct or immediate
relationship to safety or health.
(5) Any employer who fails to correct a violation for which a citation has been issued
within the period permitted for its correction may be assessed a civil penalty of up
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 12/18/2025 2:25 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 301
to fourteen thousand dollars ($14,000), as shall be adjusted as provided in
subsection (13) of this section,[seven thousand dollars ($7,000)] for each day
during which such failure or violation continues.
(6) Any employer found to be in violation of[ subsection (3) of] KRS 338.121(3) shall
be assessed a civil penalty of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each
violation.
(7) The review commission shall have the authority to modify all civil penalties and
fines provided for in this chapter. The review commission may, at its discretion,
suspend the time period allotted for correction of a violation during the review of an
appeal from the violation in question.
(8) All civil penalties and fines collected under the provision of this chapter shall be
paid into the general fund.
(9) Any employer or individual who knowingly makes any false statement,
representation, or certification in any application, record, report, plan, or other
document filed or required to be maintained pursuant to this chapter shall, upon
conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000),
or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or by both.
(10) Any person who gives advance notice of any investigation or inspection to be
conducted under this chapter, without authority from the commissioner, shall, upon
conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or
by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or by both.
(11) Any employer or individual who willfully causes bodily harm to any authorized
representative of the commissioner while attempting to conduct an investigation or
inspection under the provisions of this chapter, shall, upon conviction, be punished
by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment for
not more than one (1) year, or by both.
(12) As used in this section, a serious violation shall be deemed to exist in a place of
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 12/18/2025 2:25 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 301
employment if there is a substantial probability that death or serious physical harm
could result from a condition which exists, or from one (1) or more practices,
means, methods, operations, or processes which have been adopted or are in use, in
such place of employment unless the employer did not, and could not with the
exercise of reasonable diligence, know of the presence of the violation.
(13) Beginning August 1, 2026, the secretary shall annually adjust the maximum civil
penalties provided for in subsections (1), (2), (3), and (5) of this section by the
percent increase in the nonseasonally adjusted annual average Consumer Price
Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U), U.S. City Average, All Items, between
the two (2) most recent calendar years available, as published by the United States
Bureau of Labor Statistics. The amount of each adjustment to the maximum civil
penalties shall be rounded to the nearest whole dollar. Beginning August 1, 2026,
the secretary shall begin a three (3) year phase-in for the penalty adjustments.
The adjustments to the penalties shall be effective on each August 1. If the CPI-U
is discontinued or revised, any other historical index or computation approved by
the secretary shall be used for purposes of this section that would obtain
substantially the same result as if the CPI-U had not been discontinued or
revised.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 12/18/2025 2:25 PM Jacketed